hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Szájápolás > Fogfehérítők: Szénpor; LED-fénykészletek; Tálcás tokok; Fehérítő hab; Fehérítő gélek; Fehérítő készletek; Fehérítő szájvíz; Fehérítő tollak; Fehérítő kapszulák; Fehérítő por; Fehérítő szérumok; Fehérítő csíkok; Fehérítő tabletták
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Tannpleie > Tannblekere: Kullpulver; Sett for LED-lyspærer; Skuffevesker; Blekende skum; Blekende geleer; Tannblekingssett; Blekende munnvask; Blekepenner; Blekeputer; Blekepulver; Blekeserumer; Blekestriper; Bleketabletter
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 口腔护理 > 牙齿美白用品: 碳粉; LED 灯套件; 托盘箱; 美白泡沫; 美白凝胶; 美白套装; 美白漱口水; 美白笔; 美白胶囊; 美白粉; 美白精华; 美白牙贴; 美白片
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Mundpleje > Tandblegning: Trækulspulver; LED-lyssæt; Bakkekasser; Tandblegning – Skum; Tandblegning – Gel; Blegesæt; Tandblegning – Mundskyl; Tandblegning – Pen; Tandblegning – Puder; Tandblegning – pulver; Blegende serum; Tandblegning – Strimler; Blegetabletter
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Burnos priežiūra > Dantų balikliai: Medžio anglies milteliai; Šviesos diodų lempučių rinkiniai; Kapų dėklai; Balinimo putos; Balinimo geliai; Balinimo rinkiniai; Balinantis burnos skalavimo skystis; Balinimo pieštukai; Balinimo kapsulės; Balinimo pudra; Balinimo serumai; Balinimo juostelės; Balinimo tabletės
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Ağız Bakımı > Diş Beyazlatıcılar: Kömür Tozu; LED Işık Kitleri; Tepsi Kılıfları; Beyazlatıcı Köpük; Beyazlatma Jelleri; Beyazlatma Kitleri; Beyazlatıcı Gargara; Beyazlatma Kalemleri; Beyazlatma Kapsülleri; Beyazlatma Tozu; Beyazlatma Serumları; Beyazlatma Şeritleri; Beyazlatma Tabletleri
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Higiena jamy ustnej > Wybielacze zębów: Węgiel drzewny w proszku; Zestawy LED do wybielania zębów; Pudełeczka; Pianka wybielająca; Żele wybielające; Zestawy wybielające; Wybielający płyn do płukania ust; Długopisy wybielające; Kostki wybielające; Proszek wybielający; Serum wybielające; Paski wybielające; Tabletki wybielające
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijire orală > Produse pentru albirea dinților: Pudră de cărbune; Seturi cu lumini LED; Cutii pentru gutiere; Spumă pentru albirea dinților; Geluri pentru albirea dinților; Kituri de albire; Apă de gură pentru albirea dinților; Aplicatoare tip stilou pentru albirea dinților; Capsule pentru albirea dinților; Pudră pentru albirea dinților; Seruri de albire; Benzi pentru albirea dinților; Tablete de albire
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Munvård > Tandblekning: Träkolspulver; LED-ljuskit; Tråghållare; Blekningsskum; Blekningsgeler; Tandblekningskit; Blekningsmunvatten; Blekningspennor; Blekningsdynor; Blekningspuder; Tandblekningsserum; Blekningsremsor; Tandblekningstabletter
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o ústnu dutinu > Bieliace prostriedky na zuby: Aktívne uhlie v prášku; LED svetelné súpravy; Puzdrá s miskou; Bieliaca pena; Bieliace gély; Bieliace súpravy; Bieliaca ústna voda; Bieliace perá; Bieliace tobolky; Bieliaci prášok; Bieliace séra; Bieliace pásiky; Bieliace tablety
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Mundpflege > Zahnaufhellung: Aktivkohlepulver; LED-Lichtsets; Schienendose; Aufhellungsschaum; Aufhellungsgele; Zahnaufhellungs-Sets; Aufhellendes Mundwasser; Aufhellungsstifte; Whitening-Pods; Aufhellungspulver; Zahnaufhellungs-Seren; Aufhellungsstreifen; Zahnaufhellungs-Tabletten
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 口腔保健 > 牙齒美白產品: 木炭粉; LED 燈套組; 牙套盒; 美白泡沫; 美白膠; 美白套組; 美白漱口水; 美白筆; 美白套; 美白粉; 美白精華; 美白貼; 美白錠
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลปาก > ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำให้ฟันขาว: ผงชาร์โคล; ชุดไฟ LED; กล่องใส่ของ; ไวท์เทนนิ่งโฟม; ไวท์เทนนิ่งเจล; ชุดฟอกสีฟัน; น้ำยาบ้วนปากไวท์เทนนิ่ง; ปากกาไวท์เทนนิ่ง; ไวท์เทนนิ่งพ็อด; ผงไวท์เทนนิ่ง; เซรั่มฟอกสีฟัน; แถบไวท์เทนนิ่ง; เม็ดฟอกสีฟัน
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > 口腔ケア > ホワイトニング: チャコールパウダー; LDEライトボックス; トレイケース; ホワイトニングフォーム; ホワイトニングジェル; ホワイトニングキット; ホワイトニングマウスウォッシュ; ホワイトニングペン; ホワイトニングポッド; ホワイトニングパウダー; ホワイトニングセラム; ホワイトニングストリップ; ホワイトニングタブレット
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o ústní dutinu > Přípravky na bělení zubů: Pudry s aktivním uhlím; Sady na bělení zubů LED světlem; Úložné krabičky a pouzdra; Bělicí pěna; Bělicí gely; Bělicí sady; Bělicí ústní voda; Bělicí pera; Kapsle na bělení zubů; Bělicí prášek; Bělicí séra; Bělicí proužky; Bělicí tablety
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado bucal > Blanqueadores dentales: Polvo de carbón; Kits de luces LED; Estuches para bandejas; Espuma blanqueadora; Geles blanqueadores; Kits de blanqueamiento; Enjuague bucal blanqueador; Bolígrafos blanqueadores; Pastillas blanqueadoras; Polvo blanqueador; Sueros blanqueadores; Tiras blanqueadoras; Tabletas blanqueadoras
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Орална грижа > Избелващи средства за зъби: Въглен на прах; Комплекти LED светлини; Калъфи за избелващи шини; Избелваща пяна; Избелващи гелове; Комплекти за избелване; Избелваща вода за уста; Избелващи писалки; Избелващи таблетки; Избелващ прах; Избелващи серуми; Избелващи ленти; Избелващи таблетки
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 구강 관리 > 치아 미백제: 숯가루; LED 조명 세트; 트레이 케이스; 화이트닝 폼; 화이트닝 젤; 화이트닝 키트; 화이트닝 구강세척제; 화이트닝 펜; 화이트닝 포드; 화이트닝 분말; 화이트닝 세럼; 화이트닝 스트립; 화이트닝 정제
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soins buccaux > Blanchisseurs de dents: Poudre au charbon; Kits d’éclairage LED; Caisses à plateaux; Mousse blanchissante; Gels blanchissants; Kits de blanchiment dentaire; Rince-bouche blanchissant; Stylos blanchissants; Capsules blanchissants; Poudres blanchissantes; Sérums blanchissants; Bandes blanchissantes; Comprimés blanchissants
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado oral > Branqueadores dentários: Pó de carvão; Kits de iluminação LED; Estojos para bandejas; Espuma branqueadora; Géis branqueadores; Kit de branqueamento; Elixires branqueadores; Canetas branqueadoras; Cápsulas branqueadoras; Pó branqueador; Séruns de branqueamento; Tiras branqueadoras; Comprimidos de branqueamento
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados bucais > Branqueadores dentais: Carvão em pó; Kits de luz LED; Estojos de bandeja; Espuma branqueadora; Géis branqueadores; Kits de clareamento; Enxaguante bucal branqueador; Canetas branqueadoras; Cápsulas branqueadoras; Pó branqueador; Séruns clareadores; Tiras branqueadoras; Comprimidos clareadores
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Mondverzorging > Tandbleekmiddelen: Houtskoolpoeder; LED-lichtkits; Bakjesdozen; Bleekschuim; Bleekgels; Bleekmiddel kit; Bleekmondwater; Bleekpennen; Bleekpods; Bleekpoeder; Bleekmiddel serums; Bleekstrips; Bleekmiddel tabletten
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc răng miệng > Sản phẩm làm trắng răng: Bột than; Bộ đèn LED; Hộp đựng máng; Bọt làm trắng; Gel làm trắng; Bộ làm trắng răng; Nước súc miệng làm trắng răng; Bút làm trắng; Máy làm trắng; Bột làm trắng; Serum làm trắng răng; Miếng dán làm trắng; Viên làm trắng răng
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Oral Care > Teeth Whiteners: Charcoal Powder; LED Light Kits; Tray Cases; Whitening Foam; Whitening Gels; Whitening Kits; Whitening Mouthwash; Whitening Pens; Whitening Pods; Whitening Powder; Whitening Serums; Whitening Strips; Whitening Tablets
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за полостью рта > Отбеливание зубов: Порошки с активированным углем; Наборы для отбеливания с LED-лампой; Контейнеры для кап; Отбеливающие пенки; Отбеливающие гели; Наборы для отбеливания; Отбеливающие ополаскиватели для рта; Отбеливающие карандаши; Капсулы для отбеливания; Отбеливающие порошки; Отбеливающие сыворотки; Отбеливающие полоски; Отбеливающие таблетки
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Igiene orale > Sbiancante per denti: Polvere di carbone; Kit luci LED; Custodie; Schiuma sbiancante; Gel sbiancanti; Kit di sbiancamento; Collutorio sbiancante; Penne sbiancanti; Pod sbiancanti; Polvere sbiancante; Sieri sbiancanti; Strisce sbiancanti; Compresse sbiancanti
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Ustna higiena > Sredstva za beljenje zob: Oglje v prahu; Kompleti LED luči; Etuiji za zobne opornice; Pena za beljenje; Gel za beljenje; Kompleti za beljenje; Belilna ustna vodica; Peresa za beljenje zob; Belilni vložki; Belilni prašek; Serumi za beljenje; Belilni trakovi; Tablete za beljenje
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Suunhoito > Hampaiden valkaisu: Hiilijauhe; LED-valosarjat; Tarjotinpakkaukset; Valkaisuvaahto; Valkaisugeelit; Hammasvalkaisusarja; Valkaiseva suuvesi; Valkaisukynät; Valkaisukuoret; Valkaisujauhe; Valkaisuseerumi; Valkaisuliuskat; Valkaisutabletti
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega usne šupljine > Sredstva za izbjeljivanje zubi: Drveni ugljen u prahu; Kompleti s LED svjetlima; Kutije za udlage; Pjena za izbjeljivanje; Gelovi za izbjeljivanje; Kompleti za izbjeljivanje; Vodica za ispiranje usta za izbjeljivanje; Olovke za izbjeljivanje; Ampule za izbjeljivanje; Prah za izbjeljivanje; Serumi za izbjeljivanje; Trakice za izbjeljivanje; Tablete za izbjeljivanje
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Στοματική φροντίδα > Λευκαντικά δοντιών: Σκόνη άνθρακα; Σετ LED φωτισμού; Θήκες δίσκων; Αφρός λεύκανσης; Τζελ λεύκανσης; Σετ λεύκανσης; Στοματικό διάλυμα λεύκανσης; Γραφίδες λεύκανσης; Κάψουλες λεύκανσης; Σκόνες λεύκανσης; Οροί λεύκανσης; Λωρίδες λεύκανσης; Ταμπλέτες λεύκανσης